Rhode Island statutes. Title 15 Domestic Relations
Chapter 1 Persons Eligible to Marry

15-1-1.
Equal access to marriage.

Any person who otherwise meets the eligibility requirements of chapters 15-1 and 15-2 may marry any other eligible person regardless of gender.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 191, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 243, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 287, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 415, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

5-1-1

; P.L. 2013, ch. 4, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 5, § 1.

15-1-2.
Marrying kindred forbidden.

No person shall marry his or her sibling, parent, grandparent, child, grandchild, stepparent, grandparents’ spouse, spouse’s child, spouse’s grandchild, sibling’s child or parent’s sibling.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 191, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 243, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 287, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 415, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

15-1-2

; P.L. 2013, ch. 4, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 5, § 1.

15-1-3.
Incestuous marriages void.

If any person intermarries within the degrees stated in §

15-1-2

, the marriage shall be null and void.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 191, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 243, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 287, § 3; impl. am. G.L. 1923, ch. 107, § 13; P.L. 1926, ch. 843, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 415, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

15-1-3

; P.L. 2013, ch. 4, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 5, § 1.

15-1-4.
Marriages of kindred allowed by Jewish religion.

The provisions of §§

15-1-2

and

15-1-3

shall not extend to, or in any way affect, any marriage which shall be solemnized among the Jewish people, within the degrees of affinity or consanguinity allowed by their religion.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 191, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 243, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 287, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 415, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

5-1-4

; P.L. 2013, ch. 4, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 5, § 1.

15-1-5.
Bigamous marriages void — Marriage of persons who are mentally incompetent.

A person is prohibited from marrying if such person is:

A party to another marriage; or

A party to a relationship that provides substantially the same rights, benefits and responsibilities as a marriage whether entered into in this state or another state or jurisdiction and such marriage or relationship has not been finally dissolved, unless the parties to the intended marriage will be the same as the parties to such other marriage or relationship. Any marriage entered in violation of this prohibition and any marriage where either of the parties is mentally incompetent at the time of the marriage, shall be absolutely void, and no life estate created by chapter 25 of title 33 shall be assigned to any surviving spouse in consequence of the marriage.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 191, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 243, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 287, § 5; P.L. 1927, ch. 1066, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 415, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

15-1-5

; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 19; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 19; P.L. 2013, ch. 4, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 5, § 1.

15-1-6.
Declaration of validity of marriage by divorced person.

Any marriage, which may have been deemed and held void because a former wife or husband of either of the parties to the marriage, divorced from the party by final decree, was living at the time of the marriage, may be declared valid and binding upon the parties by decree of the family court, if the marriage was in all other respects lawful. The decree may be entered at the discretion of the court upon the petition of either party to the marriage, or of any of the issue of the marriage, and after a hearing and notice to all persons known to have an interest in the marriage as the court may deem necessary, and the decree may declare that the issue of the marriage shall be deemed legitimate and that the widow of any party to the marriage shall be entitled to her life estate created by chapter 25 of title 33.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 287, § 5; P.L. 1927, ch. 1066, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 415, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

15-1-6

; impl. am. P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 14.

15-1-7.
Marriage codification.

Marriage is the legally recognized union of two (2) people. Terms relating to the marital relationship or familial relationships shall be construed consistently with this section for all purposes throughout the law, whether in the context of statute, administrative or court rule, policy, common law, or any other source of civil law.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 4, § 2; P.L. 2013, ch. 5, § 2.

15-1-8.
Recognition of relationships entered into in another state or jurisdiction.

If two (2) persons are within the jurisdiction of Rhode Island and have a legal union other than a marriage that provides substantially the same rights, benefits and responsibilities as a marriage and the union was validly entered into in another state or jurisdiction and the union is not prohibited by this chapter then they shall be afforded the same rights, benefits and responsibilities as a valid marriage in this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 4, § 2; P.L. 2013, ch. 5, § 2.

15-1-9.
Applicability of state laws to marriages not recognized by federal law.

Any provision of Rhode Island law that refers to, adopts, or relies upon provisions of federal law, including, but not limited to, those in title 44, shall apply to parties recognized as married under the laws of this state, as if federal laws recognized such marriages in the same manner as Rhode Island law.

Notwithstanding the unavailability of federal financial participation, no person who is recognized as a spouse under the laws of this state shall be denied benefits that are otherwise available to spouses under Rhode Island law, including, but not limited to, those in chapters 40-8 to 40-8.10 inclusive, due to the provisions of 1 U.S.C. § 7 or any other federal non-recognition of spouses of the same sex.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 4, § 2; P.L. 2013, ch. 5, § 2.